Virginia statutes. Title 51.1. Pensions, Benefits, and Retirement.
Article 1. General Provisions.

§ 51.1-800.
Counties, cities, and certain towns to establish local systems or participate in Virginia Retirement System.

Every county and city, and every town having a population of 5,000 or more, shall provide a retirement system for those officers and employees listed in subsection B either (i) by establishing and maintaining a local retirement system which provides a service retirement allowance to each employee who retires at age sixty-five or older which equals or exceeds two-thirds of the service retirement allowance to which the employee would have been entitled had the allowance been computed under the provisions of the Virginia Retirement System or (ii) by participating directly in the Virginia Retirement System.

The following persons shall be covered by a retirement system as provided in subsection A:

Officers and employees who are regularly employed full time on a salaried basis, whose tenure is not restricted to temporary or provisional employment.

Officers and employees who are regularly employed full time on a salaried basis, whose tenure is not restricted to temporary or provisional employment by an organization other than a public school board that functions solely within the boundaries of a county, city, or town, unless the cost of the organization’s operation is borne by (i) users of services, (ii) more than one county, city, or town, or (iii) an entity other than a county, city, or town.

Clerks of the circuit court and deputies or employees of such officers.

Nothing in this chapter shall be construed to prohibit a county, city, or town from participating in the Virginia Retirement System and establishing a local retirement system. If a locality participates in the Virginia Retirement System and establishes a local retirement system, pursuant to §

51.1-801

, providing supplemental benefits to the state system, the local system shall not be required to satisfy the criterion established in clause A (i) of this section.

A county, city, or town shall not be required to provide retirement benefits to an employee who enters into an agreement with the local government for inclusion in a deferred compensation plan when the agreement specifically prohibits inclusion in any other retirement system established by the county, city, or town.

History.

1952, c. 157, § 51-111.31; 1954, c. 241; 1958, c. 367; 1960, c. 400; 1973, c. 523; 1974, c. 353; 1975, c. 296; 1976, c. 581; 1977, c. 620; 1990, c. 832; 1991, c. 381; 1993, c. 866; 2006, c. 406.

The 2006 amendments.

The 2006 amendment by c. 406 deleted the last four sentences of subsection A, which formerly read: “The Board of Trustees of the Virginia Retirement System shall determine whether a local retirement system satisfies the criterion of (i) above, taking into account the difference between the employee contribution rates under the local retirement system and the Virginia Retirement System. If any local retirement system fails to satisfy the criterion of (i) above, the Virginia Retirement System shall promptly notify the governing body of the county, city, or town which maintains such local retirement system of the deficiency. If, within ninety days of such notice, the local retirement system, or its governing body, fails to correct the deficiency or to persuade the Virginia Retirement System that its original findings were in error, then the Virginia Retirement System shall notify the Comptroller. The Comptroller shall withhold from such locality the payment of its share of net profits from the operation of the alcoholic beverage control system as provided for by §

4.1-117

until such time as the Virginia Retirement System may notify him that criterion (i) above is being satisfied.”

Michie’s Jurisprudence.

For related discussion, see

13B M.J. Municipal Corporations, § 81.

OPINIONS OF THE ATTORNEY GENERAL

Actuarially sound retirement system. —

Both the city charter and the general laws of the Commonwealth require the city of Newport News to have an actuarially sound retirement system for its employees. See opinion of Attorney General to The Honorable Phillip A. Hamilton, Member, House of Delegates, 06-041 (6/20/06).

§ 51.1-801.
Counties, cities, and towns generally.

The governing body of any county, city, or town may, by ordinance adopted by a recorded vote of a majority of the members elected, establish a retirement system.
The retirement system may cover injured or retired officers and employees of the county, city, or town.
Benefits may be payable to the officers and employees or their dependents, estates, or designated beneficiaries.
The retirement system may provide for accrued vested or contractual rights thereunder.
The local governing body may, through self-funding or the purchase of insurance and annuities, or a combination thereof, provide retirement allowances, death benefits, and group life insurance coverage for officers and employees of the county, city, or town and group accident and sickness insurance coverage for officers and employees of the county, city, or town and their dependents. The governing body may by ordinance establish a fund for the payment of retirement allowances, death benefits, and insurance and annuity premiums by appropriating funds from the treasury of the county, city, or town or by requiring employee contributions through payroll deductions, or both, or by any other mode not prohibited by law.

For the purposes of this section, the term “employees” may include teachers or other employees of county, city, and town school boards.

If any county, city, or town participates in the Virginia Retirement System and also establishes a local retirement system providing supplemental benefits to the employees covered under the Virginia Retirement System, the local system shall not be required to satisfy the retirement age and service criterion established in clause A (i) of §

51.1-800

.

History.

Code 1919, § 3035; 1932, p. 752; 1942, p. 178; 1944, p. 54; 1945, p. 74; 1946, p. 61; Code 1950, § 51-112; 1952, cc. 59, 587; 1959, Ex. Sess., c. 58; 1960, c. 404; 1968, c. 60; 1980, c. 135; 1989, Sp. Sess., c. 3; 1990, c. 832.

Cross references.

For constitutional prohibition against special laws granting pensions, see Va. Const., Art. IV, § 14.

§ 51.1-801.1.
Portability of service credit between certain political subdivisions of the Commonwealth and the Virginia Retirement System or certain other political subdivisions of the Commonwealth.

Any political subdivision of the Commonwealth which has a defined benefit plan that is not supplemental to the Virginia Retirement System may enter into an agreement with the Virginia Retirement System to permit any vested member of the Virginia Retirement System, upon entering service in a covered position and filing a written application with the political subdivision’s plan, to purchase service credit, of an amount to be determined by the governing authority of the political subdivision’s plan, in the political subdivision’s plan. The purchase shall be accomplished by and upon the transfer of assets to the political subdivision’s plan from the Virginia Retirement System as provided in the agreement.

Any political subdivision of the Commonwealth which has a defined benefit plan that is not supplemental to the Virginia Retirement System (the “transferor’s plan”) may enter into an agreement with any other political subdivision of the Commonwealth which has a defined benefit plan that is not supplemental to the Virginia Retirement System (the “transferee’s plan”) to permit any vested member of the transferor’s plan, upon entering service in a covered position and filing a written application with the transferee’s plan, to purchase service credit, of an amount to be determined by the governing authority of the transferee’s plan, in the transferee’s plan. The purchase shall be accomplished by and upon the transfer of assets to the transferee’s plan from the transferor’s plan as provided in the agreement.

History.

1996, cc. 939, 990.

Editor’s note.

Acts 1996, cc. 939 and 990, cl. 2 provides: “[t]hat creditable service attributable to service rendered in a part-time elected position shall not be eligible for transfer under the terms of portability defined in §§

51.1-143.1

and

51.1-801.1

.”

§ 51.1-802.
Assets of retirement systems; exemption from taxation; execution and assignment.

The assets of any retirement system established pursuant to this article, or by a city or town charter, are hereby exempted from any state, county, or municipal tax. The assets of a retirement system, retirement allowances, and other benefits accrued or accruing to any person under the provisions of this chapter, or under any city or town charter, shall not be subject to execution, attachment, garnishment, or any other process except for administrative actions pursuant to Chapter 19 (§

63.2-1900

et seq.) of Title 63.2 or any court process to enforce a child or child and spousal support obligation, nor shall any assignment thereof be enforceable in any court.
However, retirement benefits and assets created under this title which are deemed to be marital property pursuant to Chapter 6 (§

20-89.1

et seq.) of Title 20 may be divided or transferred by the court by direct assignment to a spouse or former spouse pursuant to §

20-107.3

.

History.

Code 1919, § 3035; 1932, p. 752; 1942, p. 178; 1944, p. 54; 1945, p. 74; 1946, p. 61; Code 1950, § 51-112; 1952, cc. 59, 587; 1959, Ex. Sess., c. 58; 1960, c. 404; 1968, c. 60; 1980, c. 135; 1989, Sp. Sess., c. 3; 1990, c. 832; 1991, c. 433; 1992, c. 716.

Cross references.

For constitutional prohibition against special laws granting pensions, see Va. Const., Art. IV, § 14.

§ 51.1-803.
Investments of retirement systems.

If the governing body of any county, city, or town establishes a retirement system pursuant to the provisions of this article, any funds that may be allocated, segregated, or otherwise designated for the retirement system, which are on hand at any time and are not necessary for immediate payment of pensions or benefits, shall be invested with the care, skill, prudence and diligence under the circumstances then prevailing that a prudent person acting in a like capacity and familiar with such matters would use in the conduct of an enterprise of like character and with the same aims. Such investments shall be diversified so as to minimize the risk of large losses unless under the circumstances it is clearly prudent not to do so.

The selection of services related to the management, purchase, or sale of investments authorized by this section, including but not limited to actuarial services, shall be governed by the standard of care set forth in this section and shall not be subject to the provisions of the Virginia Public Procurement Act (§

2.2-4300

et seq.) of Title 2.2.

In the case of an automatic rollover of a mandatory cash-out, as that term is defined under I.R.C. Section 401 (a) (31) (B) of the United States Internal Revenue Code of 1986 (including as such section is amended or renumbered or any successor provision thereto) and regulations thereunder applicable to governmental plans, the governing body shall not be liable for any loss resulting from the governing body’s selection of an individual retirement plan provider and investment product where the selection is made in accordance with guidelines to be adopted by the governing body that are similar to the safe harbor guidelines adopted by the United States Department of Labor for this purpose.

History.

1986, c. 196, § 51-112.1; 1990, c. 832; 1992, c. 810; 1995, c. 307; 1996, c. 508; 1997, c. 213; 2005, c. 196.

Cross references.

As to exemptions under the Virginia Freedom of Information Act for certain records, see §

2.2-3705.7

.

As to authority to hold closed meetings for certain purposes, see §

2.2-3711

.

The 2005 amendments.

The 2005 amendment by c. 196 added subsection C.

OPINIONS OF THE ATTORNEY GENERAL

Actuarially sound retirement system. —

Both the city charter and the general laws of the Commonwealth require the city of Newport News to have an actuarially sound retirement system for its employees. See opinion of Attorney General to The Honorable Phillip A. Hamilton, Member, House of Delegates, 06-041 (6/20/06).

A locality may not impose restrictions that are more stringent than those authorized by the Virginia Clean Indoor Air Act,

therefore, a locality may not ban all smoking in restaurants. See opinion of Attorney General to The Honorable, Bill Janis, Member, House of Delegates, 07-065 (7/10/07).

§ 51.1-804.
In certain cities.

Chapter 251 of the Acts of 1942, as amended by Chapter 81 of the Acts of 1946, codified as § 3035r of Michie Code 1942, relating to pensions, etc., for officers and employees of any city having a population of not less than 100,000 nor more than 170,000, and of any city adjoining a county having a density of population of more than 1,000 per square mile, is continued in effect.

History.

1942, c. 251; 1946, c. 81; Code 1950, § 51-113; 1990, c. 832.

§ 51.1-805.
In certain counties.

The following laws are continued in effect:

Chapter 111 of the Acts of 1942, codified as § 2733a of Michie Code 1942, as amended by Chapter 48 of the Acts of 1947, and as amended by Chapter 212 of the Acts of 1948, as amended by Chapter 555 of the Acts of 1950, as amended by Chapter 272 of the Acts of 1975, and as amended by Chapter 88 of the Acts of 1980, authorizing a retirement system for the employees of Arlington County.

Chapter 303 of the Acts of 1944, as amended, authorizing a police retirement system for any county having the urban county executive form of government and previously recodified as Article 4 of Title 51, §§ 51-127.10 through 51-127.30.

Chapter 161 of the Acts of 1946, as amended by Chapter 184 of the Acts of 1956, and as amended by Chapter 268 of the Acts of 1958, providing for police and firemen’s pensions and benefits in counties having a population in excess of 1,000 per square mile.

Chapter 282 of the Acts of 1946, as amended, authorizing police and firemen’s pensions in Norfolk County was repealed by Chapter 296 of the Acts of 1950.

Chapter 278 of the Acts of 1946, as amended by Chapter 184 of the Acts of 1956, and as amended by Chapter 267 of the Acts of 1958, providing for employees’ pensions and benefits in counties having a population in excess of 1,000 per square mile.

Chapter 4 of the Acts of 1947, as amended by Chapter 490 of the Acts of 1950, providing for a system of pensions, etc., for the officers and employees of any county adjoining a county having a population of more than 1,000 per square mile.

Chapter 45 of the Acts of 1948, as amended by Chapter 492 of the Acts of 1950, authorizing the establishment of a retirement and pension plan for the employees of any county adjoining a county having a population of more than 1,000 per square mile, is hereby incorporated in this section by this reference.

History.

1936, c. 224; 1942, c. 111; 1944, p. 437; 1946, cc. 161, 278, 282; 1947, cc. 4, 21, 48; 1948, cc. 45, 212; Code 1950, §§ 51-114, 51-127.10 through 51-127.30; 1950, cc. 296, 490, 492, 555; 1952, c. 421; 1952, Ex. Sess., c. 6; 1954, c. 432; 1956, c. 184; 1958, cc. 18, 76, 267, 268; 1962, c. 485; 1966, c. 351; 1968, c. 180; 1970, c. 599; 1972, c. 529; 1973, c. 499; 1974, c. 439; 1975, c. 272; 1976, c. 197; 1980, cc. 88, 700; 1981, c. 595; 1990, c. 832.

Editor’s note.

Acts 1990, c. 832, cl. 4 provides: “That Chapter 303 of the Acts of Assembly of 1944, as amended, and previously recodified as Article 4 of Title 51 (§§ 51-127.10 through 51-127.30) is reenacted and all of its provisions are incorporated into the Code of Virginia by reference in subdivision 2 of §

51.1-805

.”

Acts 1944, c. 303, § 1, as amended by Acts 2002, c. 686, cl. 1, and Acts 2020, c. 895, provides: “The governing body of any county having the urban county executive form of government is empowered and authorized to create and establish as hereinafter provided a board to be known as the ‘policemen’s pension and retirement board’ of the county (the board). The board when so created shall be a body corporate and shall consist of eight members, one of whom shall be the Director of Finance of the county, who shall also be the treasurer of the board; three of whom shall be members of the retirement system authorized by this act and employed by the county police department as sworn police officers and who have been elected by the members of the retirement system authorized by this act who are employed by the police department as sworn police officers, two for a term of four years and one for a term of two years, their successors to be elected for terms of four years each; and one of whom shall be a member of the retirement system authorized by this act who has retired from employment by the county police department as a sworn police officer and who has been elected by the retired members of the retirement system authorized by this act for a term of four years; and three of whom shall be appointed by the governing body of the county for terms of four years each, their successors to be appointed for terms of four years each. Once elected or appointed, each member shall continue to serve in office until his successor is elected or appointed. If a vacancy occurs in the office of a member of the policemen’s pension and retirement board of this system, the vacancy shall be filled for the unexpired term in the same manner as the office was previously filled.

“The three members of the ‘policemen’s pension and retirement board’ appointed by the governing body of the county may receive compensation at such rate as the governing body of the county may from time to time approve.

“When any such board is so created and constituted, it shall at its first meeting and annually thereafter elect one member as president and one as secretary, and it may elect one member as vice-president.

“Except as otherwise provided in this article, no member or employee of the policemen’s pension and retirement board shall have any direct or indirect interest in the gains or profits of any investment made by the board. No member or employee of the board shall, directly or indirectly, for himself or as an agent in any manner use the same, except to make such current and necessary payments as are authorized by the board.”

Acts 1944, c. 303, § 6, as amended by Acts 2020, c. 896, provides: “A police officer shall become a member of the policemen’s retirement system upon the first day he becomes a full-time or part-time employee, provided that the Board first determines that it desires to receive a part-time employee into the system. A member shall receive service credit for military leave, provided that he returns to full-time employment within 90 days of discharge and such discharge is other than dishonorable. A member shall receive service credit while on service-connected total or partial disability as defined in § 8. A member shall not receive service credit while on nonservice-connected total or partial disability, as defined in § 8. A member shall receive service credit for prior employment as a police officer with the county, provided that he shall return his contributions previously paid plus interest at the yearly rates earned by the system during the period the member’s contributions had been withdrawn. The Board may, in its discretion, accept a return of a member’s contribution on an installment basis on terms and conditions set by the Board. Each member may be allowed credit for accrued sick leave upon making application for retirement under this section or § 6(b) at the rate of one month for each 172 hours of accrued sick leave. In determining benefits, the Board shall grant same in the same manner as if the member had been employed during that period of time.

“Under such rules and regulations as are adopted by the governing body of the county, any person who has been a member of another county retirement system of such county and who withdraws therefrom and becomes a member of the policemen’s retirement system may purchase membership service credit for service rendered while a member of such other county retirement system by paying into the policemen’s retirement system all contributions that would have been due from the person had the person been a member of the policemen’s retirement system for each of the years for which membership service credit is sought.

“A member who has attained the compulsory retirement age of 60 and has 25 years of service credit shall be retired forthwith by the Board; provided, however, that upon approval of the Board, members employed prior to the effective date of this article who have not attained 25 years of service credit may continue in service until they attain 25 years of service credit. Any member who has 25 years of service credit prior to attaining the compulsory retirement age of 60 years may retire then or thereafter until his sixtieth birthdate upon written notification to the Board, setting forth at what time the retirement is to become effective; provided that such effective date shall be after his last day of service, but not be more than 90 days subsequent to giving such notice. Any member eligible for retirement under this paragraph with 25 years of service credit shall receive 60 percent of his average annual salary. The average annual salary is to be determined by taking the sum of the salary received during the last three years of active service and dividing said sum by three. In the event that a member has more than 25 years of service credit, he shall receive an additional two percent per year of his average annual salary for each year of service in excess of 25 years, but in no event shall his total compensation exceed 66 and two-thirds percent of his average annual salary.”

§ 51.1-806.
Reimbursement by Commonwealth for portion of employer contribution on account of certain officers and employees.

Any county or city operating a local retirement system which does not participate in the Virginia Retirement System and which defines as “compensation” the full compensation payable or fees earnable by its county and city treasurer, attorney for the Commonwealth, commissioner of the revenue, clerk of court, sheriff, and a deputy or employee of any such officer may be reimbursed for a portion of the employer contribution paid on behalf of any such officer, deputy, or employee.
In such cases, the political subdivision shall, at least biennially, submit to the Compensation Board information required by the Board’s actuary for computing, at the expense of the employing political subdivision, the employer contribution rate that would be applicable if all such officers, deputies, or employees thereof were members of the Virginia Retirement System.
The Retirement Board shall compute the employer contribution rate on the assumption that no service prior to the computation date was creditable, and no assets were allocable to such members.
The political subdivision shall be reimbursed by the Compensation Board on the basis on which the Commonwealth pays the salaries of such officer, deputy, or employee or shares, or would share, in the excess fees from the office.

History.

1958, c. 368, § 51-114.2; 1960, c. 486; 1966, c. 174; 1990, c. 832.